Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-2801
Real estate loan agreement, mortgage,
deed of trust, security instrument; enforcement and servicing; local ordinance
or resolution; limitation.

(1) The enforcement and servicing of any real estate loan
agreement or any mortgage, deed of trust, or other security instrument by
which the loan is secured shall be pursuant only to state and federal law.
No local ordinance or resolution may add to, change, interfere with any rights
or obligations of, impose upon, or require payment of fees or taxes of any
kind by, a lender, mortgagee, beneficiary, or trustee in a trust deed or servicer
relating to, or delay or affect the enforcement and servicing of, any real
estate loan agreement or any mortgage, deed of trust, or other security instrument
by which the loan is secured.

(2) Subsection
(1) of this section shall not apply to any ordinance or resolution adopted
pursuant to the Community Development Law.

Laws 2014, LB788, § 1.

Community Development Law, see section 18-2101.